Utah statutes.
53C-2-404.   Applicants for mineral leases -- Qualifications.

Applicants for mineral leases must, throughout the application period and throughout the duration of the lease, be in full compliance with all of the laws of the state as to qualification to do business within the state and must not be in default under those laws or the rules of the administration.



Amended by Chapter 247, 2011 General Session

